Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.140

Form and sale of bonds.

(1) Bonds of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture or mortgage may provide.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bond or any coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceedings involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of an authority or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority to aid in financing a housing project to provide dwelling accommodations for persons of low income shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for a housing project of such character and said project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and constructed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 65; 1977 ex.s. c 274 s 6; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 45; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 22; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.140. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 15; RRS s 6889-15. Formerly RCW 74.24.140.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.